apertium-mos.mos.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 1484
	Sdefs: 76
	Paradigms: 462
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools equiv-paradigms -alignMonodix -noProcComments apertium-mos.mos.dix temp.dix
-->

<dictionary>
	<!-- Note: there's a single COMBINING TILDE at the start here – may look like two ã's: -->
	<alphabet>̃aãbdeẽɛfghiĩɩklmnoõprstuũʋvwyz</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb, lexical"/> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
		<sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
		<sdef n="vbser" 	c="'To be' verb"/> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="'To have' verb"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
		<sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/> 
		<sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
		<sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym"/> 
		<sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/> 
		<sdef n="org" 	c="Organisation"/> 
		<sdef n="al" 	c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/> 
		<sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Reciprocal pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/> 
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
		<sdef n="ut" 	c="Utrum"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
		<sdef n="mf"    c="Masculine or Feminine"/>
		<sdef n="un" 	c="No gender"/> 
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
		<sdef n="du" 	c="Dual"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> 
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/> 
		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
		<sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/> 
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/> 
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/> 
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/> 
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle"/> 
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
		<sdef n="pasv" 	c="Passive"/> 
		<sdef n="actv" 	c="Active voice"/> 
		<sdef n="past" 	c="Past tense"/> 
		<sdef n="fut" 	c="Future tense"/> 
		<sdef n="subs" 	c="???"/> 
		<sdef n="ger" 	c="???"/> 
		<sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/> 
		<sdef n="pst" 	c="Positive"/> 
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
		<sdef n="unc" 	c="Uncountable"/> 
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/> 
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
		<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
		<sdef n="guio" 	c="Dash"/> 
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/> 
		<sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/>
        <sdef n="lquest"    c="Left question mark"/>
        <sdef n="file"      c="filename"/>
		<sdef n="postp"    c="postposition?"/>
		<sdef n="obj"      c="object"/>
		<sdef n="rel"      c="relative"/>
	</sdefs>
		
	
		<!-- noun -->
		<pardefs>
		<pardef n="ãad/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãad/re__n">
			<e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãb/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãb/re__n">
			<e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>rã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãd/ga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="alsɩlaam/a__n">
			<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>do</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãmpul/li__n">
			<e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>li<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>        <r>li<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>lã</l>        <r>li<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>li<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>li<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ana/na__n">
			<e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>nã</l>        <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ãba</l>       <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ãbã</l>       <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãndũn/i__n">
			<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ya</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>yã</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>irãmba</l>    <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ãnglind/i__n">
			<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

	<e lm="ãadga">           <i>ãad</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãadre">           <i>ãad</i><par n="ãad/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãbga">            <i>ãb</i><par n="ãb/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãbre">            <i>ãb</i><par n="ãb/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãdga">            <i>ãd</i><par n="ãd/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="alsɩlaama">       <i>alsɩlaam</i><par n="alsɩlaam/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãmpulli">         <i>ãmpul</i><par n="ãmpul/li__n"/></e>
	<e lm="anana">           <i>ana</i><par n="ana/na__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãndũni">          <i>ãndũn</i><par n="ãndũn/i__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãnglindi">        <i>ãnglind</i><par n="ãnglind/i__n"/></e>
	<e lm="baaga">           <i>baa</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="bãaga">           <i>bãa</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãadga">           <i>ãad</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãadre">           <i>ãad</i><par n="ãad/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãbga">            <i>ãb</i><par n="ãb/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãbre">            <i>ãb</i><par n="ãb/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãdga">            <i>ãd</i><par n="ãd/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="alsɩlaama">       <i>alsɩlaam</i><par n="alsɩlaam/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãmpulli">         <i>ãmpul</i><par n="ãmpul/li__n"/></e>
	<e lm="anana">           <i>ana</i><par n="ana/na__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãndũni">          <i>ãndũn</i><par n="ãndũn/i__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ãnglindi">        <i>ãnglind</i><par n="ãnglind/i__n"/></e>
	<e lm="baaga">           <i>baa</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="bãaga">           <i>bãa</i><par n="ãad/ga__n"/></e>
